Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 3. Membership.

Sec. 39.35.120.
Commencement of participation.

An employee of the state shall be included in this plan upon commencement of employment with the state, or on January 1, 1961, whichever is later. Unless an employee participates in a university retirement program under AS

14.40.661

—

14.40.799

, an employee of a political subdivision or public organization that becomes an employer shall be included in the plan on the effective date of the employer’s participation or the date of the employee’s commencement of employment with the employer, whichever is later.

Inclusion in the plan is a condition of employment for an employee except as otherwise provided for

an elected official;

[Repealed by § 12 ch 57 SLA 2001, as amended by § 10 ch 50 SLA 2005, effective July 1, 2009.]

an employee of the university who participates in a university retirement program under AS

14.40.661

—

14.40.799

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 155 SLA 1966; am § 28 ch 13 SLA 1980; am § 27 ch 146 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 104 SLA 1989; am §§ 7, 12 ch 57 SLA 2001; am § 7 ch 97 SLA 2001; am § 21 ch 92 SLA 2004; am § 86 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Cross references. —

For the intent of the legislature concerning the amendments to this section made by ch. 97, SLA 2001, see § 1, ch. 97, SLA 2001 in the 2001 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 3.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 13, ch. 97, SLA 2001 provides that the amendments to this section made by ch. 97, SLA 2001 do “not modify the terms of a contract between the state and a nonprofit regional corporation in existence on the effective date of this Act.” The effective date of § 7, ch. 97, SLA 2001, which amended this section, was March 1, 2002.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Given subsection (b) of this section and AS

39.35.170

, which make inclusion in the public employees retirement system (AS 39.35) a condition of employment for state employees and contributions to it mandatory, the conclusion is that the legislature intended the statutory provisions of the public employees retirement system to apply to all state employees, and benefits under the public employees retirement system may not be negotiated under the Public Employment Relations Act (AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

).
January 23, 1978 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 39.35.125.
Participation of elected officials.

An elected official of the state or of a political subdivision of the state if the political subdivision has elected under AS

39.35.600

—

39.35.650

to designate elected officials in the classifications of employees entitled to participate in the plan is included in the plan unless the official files a written waiver of coverage with the administrator. A waiver under this subsection waives coverage of future employment as an elected official, regardless of any change of employer. An elected official may file a waiver under this subsection at any time after election to office, including the period before taking the oath of office. An elected official may revoke a waiver under this subsection by filing a written revocation with the administrator. A revocation under this subsection operates prospectively only, and the elected official may not receive credited service for service as an elected official while the waiver was in effect. There is no limit on the number of times an elected official may file a waiver or revocation under this subsection.

Service as an elected official before January 1, 1981, with an employer may be included retroactively as credited service with the plan if the elected official or former elected official makes retroactive contributions equal to what the official would have made if the elected official or former elected official had been included in the plan when the oath of office as an elected official was taken, plus accrued interest from July 1, 1984. The rate used to calculate the retroactive contributions may not be less than the rate in effect on January 1, 1961. An elected official or former elected official may not receive credited service under this subsection for any period in which the elected official or former elected official was receiving a retirement benefit from the plan. An elected official or former elected official receiving a retirement benefit from the plan on January 1, 1981, is not eligible to claim credited service under this subsection unless the elected official or former elected official is reemployed as an active member. Service as an elected official with an employer constitutes employment as an active member as long as a waiver of coverage under (a) of this section is not in effect.

An elected official included in the plan and that person’s employer are liable for contributions whenever that person is an elected official unless a waiver of coverage under (a) of this section is in effect.

History.

(§ 2 ch 155 SLA 1966; am § 3 ch 159 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 254 SLA 1976; am § 19 ch 128 SLA 1977; am §§ 8, 9 ch 82 SLA 1979; am § 28 ch 146 SLA 1980; am § 44 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 170 SLA 1984; am § 87 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 34 ch 68 SLA 2000; am § 9 ch 13 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 46, ch. 146, SLA 1980 provides: “AS

39.35.125

(a), as reenacted in § 28 of this Act, applies to an elected official holding office on or after January 1, 1981, even though he may have assumed office before that date.”

Legislative history reports. —

For purpose of the amendment made by sec. 87, ch. 21, SLA 2000 (CSHB 435(JUD)), see 2000 House Journal Supp. No. 10 (July 19, 2000).

Sec. 39.35.127.
Participation of village public safety officers. [Repealed, § 30 ch 92 SLA 2004.]

Sec. 39.35.130.
Termination of participation. [Repealed, § 55 ch 128 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 39.35.131.
Membership in teachers’ and public employees’ retirement systems.

A person who is employed at least half-time in the plan during the same period that the person is employed at least half-time in a position in the teachers’ retirement plan under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

shall receive credited service under each plan for half-time employment. However, the amount of credited service a person receives under the plan during a school year may not exceed the amount necessary, when added to the amount of credited service earned during the school year under the teachers’ retirement plan, to equal one year of credited service.

A person who was employed at least half-time in a position in the teachers’ retirement plan under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

in the same period that the person was employed at least half-time in a position in this plan may claim credited service in both plans for employment before May 31, 1989. To obtain this credited service, the person shall claim the service and verify the period of half-time employment. When eligibility for half-time service credit has been established, an indebtedness shall be determined to the retirement plan in which the person did not participate. The amount of the indebtedness is the full actuarial cost of providing benefits for the credited service claimed. Interest as prescribed by regulation accrues on that indebtedness beginning on the later of July 1, 1989, or the date on which the member is first eligible to claim the service. Any outstanding indebtedness existing at the time the person retires will require an actuarial adjustment to the benefits payable based on that service.

History.

(§ 2 ch 58 SLA 1989; am § 87 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Sec. 39.35.140.
Re-employment of former employees. [Repealed, § 55 ch 128 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 39.35.150.
Re-employment of retired employees.

If a retired employee subsequently becomes an active member, benefit payments may not be made during the period of re-employment. During the period of re-employment, deductions from the employee’s salary shall be made in accordance with AS

39.35.160

. Upon subsequent retirement, the retired employee is entitled to receive an additional pension based on the credited service and the average monthly compensation earned during the period of re-employment in accordance with AS

39.35.370

.

[Repealed by § 12 ch 57 SLA 2001, as amended by § 6 ch 15 SLA 2003 and § 10 ch 50 SLA 2005, effective July 1, 2009.]

[Repealed, § 12 ch 57 SLA 2001, as amended by § 6 ch 15 SLA 2003 and § 10 ch 50 SLA 2005, effective July 1, 2009.]

If the initial benefit payments to which the retired member is eligible have been reduced because the member retired early under AS

39.35.370(b)

or increased because the member elected to receive a level income option benefit under former AS

39.35.460

, the member shall also receive an incremental benefit based on the amount of the reduction imposed by AS

39.35.370(b)

or the increase under former AS

39.35.460

on the first benefit and the length of time that the employee was reemployed and not receiving retirement benefits. The amount of the incremental benefit is equal to the difference between the normal retirement benefit to which the member would have been entitled had the member taken a normal retirement and the early retirement benefit or benefit under the level income option that the member has been receiving based on the member’s initial period of employment multiplied by the total number of months that the member did not receive retirement benefits because of reemployment and that amount actuarially adjusted to be paid over the expected lifetime of the member. In the case of a member who selected benefits under the level income option, the total number of months may not include any month in which the member was 65 years of age or older.

A member who retired under AS

39.35.370(a)

and participated in a retirement incentive program under ch. 26, SLA 1986; ch. 89, SLA 1989; ch. 65, SLA 1996; ch. 4, FSSLA 1996; or ch. 92, SLA 1997, who is subsequently reemployed as a commissioner may become an active member without losing the incentive credit provided under the applicable retirement incentive plan and is not subject to any related reemployment indebtedness.

[Repealed, § 12 ch 50 SLA 2005.]

[Repealed, § 12 ch 50 SLA 2005.]

[Repealed, § 12 ch 50 SLA 2005.]

History.

(§ 7 ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 109 SLA 1970; am § 4 ch 159 SLA 1972; am § 11 ch 1 SLA 1974; am § 20 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 35 ch 68 SLA 2000; am §§ 8, 9, 12 ch 57 SLA 2001; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 15 SLA 2003; am §§ 7, 8, 12 ch 50 SLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings relating to the 2005 amendment of subsection (b) and enactment of subsections (f) — (h), see sec. 1, ch. 50, SLA 2005 in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.
For provision applicable to a retired teacher who was rehired and made an election under (b) or (e) of this section before November 3, 2004, see § 15(a) and (c), ch. 50, SLA 2005.
For provision applicable to a retired teacher who was rehired and made an election under (b) or (e) of this section on or after November 3, 2004, see § 15(b) and (c), ch. 50, SLA 2005.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 3.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 15, SLA 2003 (HB 140), see 2003 House Journal 340 — 341.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A retired state employee was considered “re-employed” by the state on a “regular full-time basis” if he were elected to the state legislature. 1965 Op. Att’y Gen., No. 4, issued prior to the 1977 amendment.
But see AS

39.35.125

.

A former territorial employee, retired under the Public Employees Retirement Act of 1949, was entitled to receive both his salary as a legislator and his retirement benefits while he served in the state legislature. 1965 Op. Att’y Gen., No. 4, issued prior to the 1977 amendment.

Any Public Employee Retirement System (PERS) member who became a member after July 1, 1977, who retires, returns to work, and re-retires, will receive two pensions, as calculated under this section. Any PERS member who became a member prior to July 1, 1977, will receive pension benefits as calculated under the pre-1977 version of this section. Sept. 12, 1999, Op Att’y Gen.

Sec. 39.35.153.
Army and air national guard employees.

A regular full-time civilian employee of the Alaska Army National Guard and Air National Guard, whose entire salary is paid from allotted federal funds, is included in this system, if the federal or state government pays the employer’s contributions. If the amount that the federal government may legally contribute to the system is lower than the required employer’s contribution, the state government shall contribute the difference.
If the employer’s contributions are not paid when due, service credit for the period of delinquency may not be granted until the contributions are paid.

History.

(§ 1 ch 53 SLA 1965)

Sec. 39.35.154.
North Pacific Fishery Management Council employees.

An employee of the North Pacific Fishery Management Council appointed under 16 U.S.C. 1852(f)(1) (§ 302(f)(1) of P.L. 94-265), whose compensation is paid from allotted federal funds, is included in the system if the council pays the employer’s contributions.
If the employer’s contributions are not paid when due, credited service for the period of delinquency may not be granted until the contributions are paid.

History.

(§ 1 ch 86 SLA 1977)

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 86, SLA 1977 (CSSB 135), see 1977 House Journal, p. 1206; 1977 Senate Journal, p. 535.

Secs. 39.35.155 and 39.35.157.
Former magistrates; Tokyo office employees. [Repealed, § 60 ch 21 SLA 1985.]

Sec. 39.35.158.
Administrative director of courts.

An administrative director of the Alaska court system who withdraws from the judicial retirement system under AS

22.25.012

is eligible for membership in the plan and shall receive credited service in the plan for service rendered as administrative director. To be eligible for membership in the plan under this subsection, the administrative director must contribute to the plan

the amount the director would have contributed if the director had been a member during the director’s period of membership in the judicial retirement system; and

any contributions for services as administrative director refunded by the plan at the time the director became a member of the judicial retirement system.

History.

(§ 30 ch 146 SLA 1980; am § 88 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)